data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-pliittw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - pliittõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asPliittõ'
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Nom: pliittõ
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Nom: pliitõd
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Gen: pliita
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Gen: [pliittoi, pliittojõ]
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Par: [pliitta, pliittaa]
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Par: [pliittoi, pliittoitõ]
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Ill: [pliittasõ, pliitta]
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Ill: pliittoisõ
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Ine: pliittõz
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Ine: pliittoiz
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Ela: pliitõssõ
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Ela: pliittoissõ
    pliittõ+N+Sg+All: pliitõllõ
    pliittõ+N+Pl+All: pliittoillõ
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Ade: pliitõl
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Ade: pliittoil
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Abl: pliitõltõ
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Abl: pliittoiltõ
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Tra: pliitõssi
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Tra: pliittoissi
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Ter: pliittassaa
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Ter: pliittoissaa
    pliittõ+N+Sg+Com: pliitaka
    pliittõ+N+Pl+Com: pliittoika
